Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1743.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-928, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-928. Filing officer; statements and reports A. A person that is required to file any statements and reports required by this article and articles 1, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.5, 1.6 and 1.7 of this chapter shall file with the filing officer in charge of that election, as follows: 1. The secretary of state is the filing officer for statewide and legislative elections, including retention elections for supreme court justices and court of appeals judges. The secretary of state is also the filing officer for committees that support or oppose a recall election or the circulation of a petition for a recall election for a statewide or legislative officeholder, for committees that support or oppose a statewide initiative or referendum or other statewide ballot measure, question or proposition or the circulation of a petition for a statewide initiative or referendum or other statewide ballot measure, question or proposition. 2. The county officer in charge of elections is the filing officer for county, school district, community college district and special taxing district elections, including retention elections for superior court judges. The county officer in charge of elections is also the filing officer for committees that support or oppose a recall election or the circulation of a petition for a recall election for an officeholder of a county office, a school district governing board office, a community college district governing board office or a special taxing district governing board office, for committees that support or oppose a county, school district, community college district or special taxing district initiative or referendum or other ballot measure, question or proposition, including bond, tax, budget and budget override measures or that oppose or support the circulation of a petition for a county, school district, community college district or special taxing district initiative or referendum or other county, school district, community college district or special taxing district ballot measure, question or proposition. 3. The city or town clerk is the filing officer for city and town elections. The city or town clerk is also the filing officer for committees that support or oppose a recall election or the circulation of a petition for a recall election for a city or town officeholder, for committees that support or oppose a city or town initiative or referendum or other city or town ballot measure, question or proposition or the circulation of a petition for a city or town initiative or referendum or other city ballot measure, question or proposition. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a standing committee shall file reports only with the secretary of state. C. A filing officer shall provide the option for electronic filing and shall make all statements and reports publicly available on the internet. A filing officer may comply with this section by opting into the secretary of state's electronic filing system. D. For filing periods that begin on or after April 1, 2027, on receiving a campaign finance report and before making it publicly available, the filing officer shall redact from the listed individual contributors' information the individual's street number and street name or, for an individual who provides a residence location, shall redact the individual's precise residence location. The information PRESCRIBED by this subsection may not be DISCLOSED in any manner and is not a public record.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 16, chapter 6, article 1.4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-929, to read: START_STATUTE16-929. Information disclosure; violation; classification For filing periods that begin on or after April 1, 2027, If a filing officer improperly discloses an individual's street NUMBER and street name or, for an individual who provides a residence location, the precise residence location in a campaign finance report in violation of section 16-928, subsection D, the filing officer shall remove the information from the publicly available source that is controlled or operated by the filing officer within ten business days after receipt of a written notice to redact the information.  the written notice shall be sent by certified mail to the filing officer.  A filing officer who fails to remove or redact the information within ten business days after receipt of the notice to redact is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor.END_STATUTE